ko: 성분 기본 유형: 과일 농축액(포도 제외); 과일 주스(포도 제외); 포도 농축액 블렌드; 포도 주스(비농축); 포도 주스 농축액; 포도 머스트; 벌꿀(미드 스타일); 기타
tr: Bileşen baz türü: Meyve konsantresi (üzüm dışı); Meyve suyu (üzüm dışı); Üzüm konsantresi karışımı; Üzüm suyu (konsantre olmayan); Üzüm suyu konsantresi; Üzüm şırası; Bal (mead tarzı); Diğer
de: Typ der Zutatenbasis: Fruchtkonzentrat (keine Traube); Fruchtsaft (keine Traube); Traubenkonzentrat-Mischung; Traubensaft (Direktsaft); Traubensaftkonzentrat; Traubenmost; Honig (Met-Stil); Sonstige
en: Ingredient base type: Fruit concentrate (non-grape); Fruit juice (non-grape); Grape concentrate blend; Grape juice (not from concentrate); Grape juice concentrate; Grape must; Honey (mead-style); Other
lt-LT: Ingrediento pagrindo tipas: Vaisių koncentratas (ne vynuogių); Vaisių sultys (ne vynuogių); Vynuogių koncentratų mišinys; Vynuogių sultys (ne iš koncentrato); Vynuogių sulčių koncentratas; Vynuogių misa; Medus (midaus tipo); Kita
bg-BG: Тип на основната съставка: Плодов концентрат (без грозде); Плодов сок (без грозде); Смес от гроздов концентрат; Гроздов сок (не от концентрат); Концентрат от гроздов сок; Гроздова мъст; Мед (тип медовина); Други
pt-BR: Ingrediente base tipo: Concentrado de frutas (não uva); Suco de frutas (não uva); Mistura de concentrado de uva; Suco de uva (não concentrado); Concentrado de suco de uva; Mosto de uva; Mel (estilo hidromel); Outros
nl: Ingrediënt basis type: Vruchtenconcentraat (geen druif); Vruchtensap (geen druif); Druivenconcentraatmelange; Druivensap (niet uit concentraat); Druivensapconcentraat; Druivenmost; Honing (mede-stijl); Overige
nb: Basetype for ingrediens: Fruktkonsentrat (ikke drue); Fruktjuice (ikke drue); Druekonsentratblanding; Druejuice (ikke fra konsentrat); Druejuicekonsentrat; Druemost; Honning (mjød-stil); Annet
th: ประเภทส่วนผสมหลัก: น้ำผลไม้เข้มข้น (ไม่ใช่องุ่น); น้ำผลไม้ (ไม่ใช่องุ่น); น้ำองุ่นเข้มข้นผสม; น้ำองุ่น (ไม่ใช่น้ำผลไม้เข้มข้น); น้ำองุ่นเข้มข้น; เกรปมัสต์ (น้ำองุ่นคั้นสด); น้ำผึ้ง (สไตล์มธุรส); อื่นๆ
cs: Typ základní ingredience: Ovocný koncentrát (ne hroznový); Ovocná šťáva (ne hroznová); Směs hroznového koncentrátu; Hroznová šťáva (ne z koncentrátu); Koncentrát z hroznové šťávy; Hroznový mošt; Med (medovina); Jiné
zh-CN: 原料基底类型: 水果浓缩液（非葡萄）; 果汁（非葡萄）; 葡萄浓缩液混合物; 葡萄汁（非浓缩）; 葡萄浓缩汁; 葡萄原汁; 蜂蜜（蜂蜜酒风味）; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de bază al ingredientului: Concentrat de fructe (altele decât struguri); Suc de fructe (altele decât struguri); Amestec de concentrat de struguri; Suc de struguri (nu din concentrat); Concentrat de suc de struguri; Must de struguri; Miere (stil mied); Altele
fr: Type de base d’ingrédient: Concentré de fruits (autre que le raisin); Jus de fruits (autre que le raisin); Mélange de concentré de raisin; Jus de raisin (non fait de concentré); Concentré de jus de raisin; Moût de raisin; Miel (style hydromel); Autre
es: Tipo de base del ingrediente: Concentrado de fruta (no de uva); Jugo de fruta (no de uva); Mezcla de concentrado de uva; Jugo de uva (no proveniente de concentrado); Concentrado de jugo de uva; Mosto de uva; Miel (estilo hidromiel); Otro
vi: Loại nguyên liệu cơ bản: Nước cốt trái cây (không phải nho); Nước ép trái cây (không phải nho); Hỗn hợp nước ép nho cô đặc; Nước ép nho (không từ nước ép cô đặc); Nước ép nho cô đặc; Hỗn hợp nho ép; Mật ong (kiểu mead); Khác
da: Type af ingrediensbase: Frugtkoncentrat (ikke fra vindrue); Frugtsaft (ikke fra vindrue); Blanding af vindruekoncentrat; Vindruesaft (ikke fra koncentrat); Druejuicekoncentrat; Druemost; Honning (mjød-stil); Andet
zh-TW: 基底原料類型: 水果濃縮汁 (非葡萄); 果汁 (非葡萄); 葡萄濃縮汁混合物; 葡萄汁 (非濃縮還原); 葡萄濃縮汁; 葡萄漿; 蜂蜜 (蜂蜜酒風格); 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta baze sastojka: Voćni koncentrat (osim grožđa); Voćni sok (osim grožđa); Mješavina koncentrata grožđa; Sok od grožđa (nije iz koncentrata); Koncentrat soka od grožđa; Mošt od grožđa; Med (stil medovine); Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta osnove sestavin: Sadni koncentrat (ne iz grozdja); Sadni sok (ne iz grozdja); Mešanica grozdnih koncentratov; Grozdni sok (ni iz koncentrata); Koncentrat grozdnega soka; Grozdni mošt; Med (za medico); Drugo
fi: Ainesosapohjan tyyppi: Hedelmätiiviste (ei rypäle); Hedelmämehu (ei rypäle); Rypäletiivistesekoitus; Rypälemehu (ei tiivisteestä); Rypälemehutiiviste; Rypäleen puristemehu; Hunaja (sima); Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de base de ingredientes: Concentrado de fruta (não uva); Sumo de fruta (não uva); Mistura de concentrado de uva; Sumo de uva (não proveniente de concentrado); Concentrado de sumo de uva; Mosto de uva; Mel (tipo hidromel); Outro
hu: Összetevő alaptípusa: Gyümölcskoncentrátum (nem szőlőből); Gyümölcslé (nem szőlőből); Szőlőkoncentrátum-keverék; Szőlőlé (nem sűrítményből); Szőlőlé-koncentrátum; Szőlőmust; Méz (mézbor jellegű); Egyéb
it: Tipo di base dell'ingrediente: Concentrato di frutta (non uva); Succo di frutta (non uva); Miscela di concentrato di uva; Succo di uva (non da concentrato); Concentrato di succo di uva; Mosto d’uva; Miele (stile idromele); Altro
pl: Typ bazy składnika: Koncentrat owocowy (nie z winogron); Sok owocowy (nie z winogron); Mieszanka koncentratu winogronowego; Sok winogronowy (nie z koncentratu); Koncentrat soku winogronowego; Moszcz winogronowy; Miód (w stylu miodu pitnego); Inne
sv: Typ av basingrediens: Fruktkoncentrat (ej druva); Fruktjuice (ej druva); Druvkoncentratblandning; Druvjuice (ej från koncentrat); Druvjuicekoncentrat; Druvmust; Honung (mjöd-stil); Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ základnej zložky: Ovocný koncentrát (okrem hrozna); Ovocná šťava (okrem hrozna); Zmes hroznového koncentrátu; Hroznová šťava (nie z koncentrátu); Koncentrát hroznovej šťavy; Hroznový mušt; Med (štýl medoviny); Iné
ja: 原料ベースタイプ: フルーツ濃縮物 (ブドウ以外); フルーツジュース (ブドウ以外); ブドウ濃縮ブレンド; ブドウ果汁 (ストレート); ブドウ果汁濃縮物; ブドウ果汁 (ムスト); ハチミツ (ミードスタイル); その他
el: Τύπος βάσης συστατικού: Συμπυκνωμένος χυμός φρούτων (εκτός σταφυλιού); Χυμός φρούτων (εκτός σταφυλιού); Μείγμα συμπυκνωμένου χυμού σταφυλιού; Χυμός σταφυλιού (όχι από συμπυκνωμένο); Συμπυκνωμένος χυμός σταφυλιού; Μούστος σταφυλιού; Μέλι (τύπου υδρόμελου); Άλλο
ru: Тип базового ингредиента: Фруктовый концентрат (не виноградный); Фруктовый сок (не виноградный); Смесь виноградного концентрата; Виноградный сок (не из концентрата); Концентрат виноградного сока; Виноградное сусло; Мед (в стиле медовухи); Другое